zh-TW: 電玩遊戲格式: 數位; 實體光碟; 其他
fi: Videopelin formaatti: Digitaalinen; Fyysinen; Muu
bg-BG: Формат на видеоигра: Цифрова; Физическа; Други
el: Είδος βιντεοπαιχνιδιών: Ψηφιακό; Φυσικό; Άλλο
ja: ビデオゲームのフォーマット: デジタル; 物理的な; その他
pt-BR: Formato do videogame: Digital; Físico; Outro
en: Video game format: Digital; Physical; Other
sk-SK: Formát videohry: Digitálny; Fyzický; Iné
nl: Formaat videogame: Digitaal; Fysiek; Andere
pl: Format gry wideo: Cyfrowy; Fizyczny; Inne
vi: Định dạng trò chơi điện tử: Kỹ thuật số; Vật lý; Khác
ko: 비디오 게임 형식: 디지털; 물리적; 기타
sl-SI: Format video igre: Digitalna; Fizična; Drugo
zh-CN: 视频游戏格式: 数字版; 实体版; 其他
nb: Videospillformat: Digital; Fysisk; Annet
lt-LT: Vaizdo žaidimo formatas: Skaitmeninis; Fizinis; Kita
tr: Video oyunu formatı: Dijital; Fiziksel; Diğer
pt-PT: Formato do videojogo: Digital; Físico; Outro
da: Format af videospil: Digital; Fysisk; Andet
ru: Формат видеоигры: Цифровые; Физические; Другой
hr-HR: Format videoigre: Digitalna; Fizička; Ostalo
cs: Formát videohry: Digitální; Fyzické; Jiné
sv: Videospelsformat: Digitalt; Fysiskt; Övrigt
es: Formato de videojuegos: Digital; Físico; Otros
de: Medienformat des Videospiels: Digital; Physisch; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Format jocuri video: Digital; Fizic; Altele
hu: Videójáték-formátum: Digitális; Fizikai; Egyéb
it: Formato del videogioco: Digitale; Fisico; Altro
fr: Format de jeu vidéo: Numérique; Physique; Autre
th: รูปแบบวิดีโอเกม: ดิจิทัล; กายภาพ; อื่นๆ